Vermont, session 2025-2026, S260.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 5 V.S.A. § 3405 is amended to read:
§ 3405. LEASE FOR CONTINUED OPERATION
(a) The Secretary, as agent for the State, with the approval of the General
Assembly, or if the General Assembly is not in session, approval of the Joint
Transportation Oversight Committee, is authorized to lease or otherwise
arrange for the continued operation of all or any State-owned railroad property
to any responsible person, provided that approval for the operation, if
necessary, is granted by the federal Surface Transportation Board under 49
VT LEG #385706 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.260
2026 Page 2 of 2
C.F.R. Part 1150 (certificate to construct, acquire, or operate railroad lines).
The transaction shall be subject to any further terms and conditions as in the
opinion of the Secretary are necessary and appropriate to accomplish the
purpose of this chapter.
(b) To preserve continuity of service on State-owned railroads, the
Secretary may enter into a short-term lease or operating agreement, for a term
not to exceed six months, with a responsible railroad operator. The Secretary
shall notify the House and Senate Committees on Transportation within 10
calendar days after entering into any lease or agreement pursuant to this
subsection.
(c) The Secretary shall notify the House and Senate Committees on
Transportation or, if the General Assembly is not in session, the Joint
Transportation Oversight Committee when there are 12 months remaining on
the operating lease for any State-owned railroad, and when there are 12 months
remaining on a lease extension for the operating lease for any State-owned
railroad.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385706 v.1